Washington statutes.
RCW 36.57.020

Public transportation authority authorized.

Every county, except a county in which a metropolitan municipal corporation is performing the function of public transportation on May 5, 1974, is authorized to create a county transportation authority which shall perform the function of public transportation. Such authority shall embrace all the territory within a single county and all cities and towns therein.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 167 s 2.]